Washington statutes.
RCW 17.24.031

Determination of origin.

The director may demand of a person who has in his or her possession or under his or her control, plants, bees, plant products, or other articles that may carry plant pests, bee pests, or noxious weeds, full information as to the origin and source of these items. Failure to provide that information, if known, may subject the person to a civil penalty.

[ 1991 c 257 s 7.]